Missouri, session 2026, HB1789.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 379, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto six new sections, to be
known as sections 379.2000, 379.2005, 379.2010, 379.2015, 379.2020, and 379.2025, to read
as follows:
379.2000. Sections 379.2000 to 379.2025 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Delivery Network Company Insurance Act".
379.2005. For purposes of sections 379.2000 to 379.2025, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Delivery availability period", the period when a delivery network company
driver:
(a) Has logged on to a digital network and is eligible to receive requests to
provide delivery services from a delivery network company;
(b) Is operating a personal vehicle; and
(c) Is not providing delivery services or operating in the delivery service period;
(2) "Delivery network company", an entity that:
(a) Is a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other entity;
(b) Operates in this state; and
(c) Uses a digital network to connect a delivery network company customer to a
delivery network company driver to provide delivery services;
(3) "Delivery network company customer", a person who:
(a) Orders the delivery of goods; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1789 2
(b) Directs the delivery network company driver as to the delivery location for
the goods;
(4) "Delivery network company driver", a person who provides delivery services
through a delivery network company's digital network using a personal vehicle. A
delivery network company driver is an independent contractor or agent and not an
employee of a delivery network company for all purposes;
(5) "Delivery service period", the period that:
(a) Begins when a delivery network company driver starts operating a personal
vehicle en route to pick up goods for a delivery or series of deliveries as documented
through a digital network controlled by a delivery network company;
(b) Continues while the delivery network company driver transports the
requested delivery or deliveries; and
(c) Ends upon delivery of the requested goods to:
a. The location designated by the delivery network company customer or the
location designated by the last delivery network company customer in a series of
deliveries; or
b. A location designated by the delivery network company, including for
purposes of returning the goods;
(6) "Delivery services", the fulfillment of delivery requests made by a delivery
network company customer through a digital network, including the pickup of any
goods by the delivery network company driver and the delivery of the goods to the
location designated by the delivery network company customer. The term "delivery
services" may include a series of deliveries to the designated locations of different
delivery network company customers;
(7) "Digital network", any online application, software, website, or system
offered or utilized by a delivery network company that enables deliveries with delivery
network company drivers;
(8) "Personal vehicle", a motor vehicle that is:
(a) Used by a delivery network company driver to provide delivery services
through a digital network; and
(b) Owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by the delivery network
company driver.
379.2010. 1. Sections 379.2000 to 379.2025 shall not limit the scope of federal or
state law regarding delivery or transport of goods.
2. A delivery made under sections 379.2000 to 379.2025 that is subject to any
other law shall comply with the requirements of that law.

HCS HB 1789 3
3. If a conflict arises between sections 379.2000 to 379.2025 and another law
dealing with the delivery or transport of goods, the other law prevails.
379.2015. 1. Operating a motor vehicle during the delivery availability period
shall not be construed as commercial activity.
2. A delivery network company shall ensure that during the delivery service
period, primary motor vehicle liability insurance is in effect that:
(1) Recognizes that the operator of the motor vehicle is a delivery network
company driver; or
(2) Does not exclude coverage for use of a personal vehicle to provide deliveries.
3. During the delivery service period, the delivery network company driver or
delivery network company, or any combination of the two, shall maintain motor vehicle
liability insurance coverage that insures the delivery network company driver for
liability to third parties of not less than:
(1) Fifty thousand dollars for damages arising out of bodily injury sustained by
any one person in an accident;
(2) One hundred thousand dollars for damages arising out of bodily injury
sustained by all persons injured in an accident; and
(3) Twenty-five thousand dollars for all damages arising out of damage to or
destruction of property in an accident.
4. If the insurance coverage maintained by a delivery network company driver
under subsections 2 and 3 of this section has lapsed or does not provide the required
motor vehicle liability insurance coverage, the following requirements shall apply:
(1) The insurance coverage maintained by the delivery network company shall
provide the motor vehicle liability insurance coverage required by subsections 2 and 3 of
this section beginning with the first one dollar of a claim; and
(2) The insurance coverage maintained by the delivery network company shall
provide that the motor vehicle liability insurer has the duty to defend the claim.
5. Coverage under a motor vehicle liability insurance policy maintained by the
delivery network company is not dependent upon another motor vehicle liability insurer
first denying a claim nor shall another motor vehicle liability insurance policy be
required to first deny a claim.
6. Insurance coverage required by this section shall be obtained from an
insurance company licensed to transact business under the insurance laws of this state
or by an eligible surplus lines insurer under chapter 384.
7. The coverage required under subsections 2 and 3 of this section shall be
deemed to satisfy the motor vehicle financial responsibility requirements for a motor
vehicle under chapter 303.

HCS HB 1789 4
8. (1) A delivery network company driver shall carry proof of insurance
required under subsections 2 and 3 of this section at all times while using a personal
vehicle in connection with a digital network. A digital network is not a product under
the law.
(2) In the event of an accident, a delivery network company driver shall, upon
request:
(a) Provide insurance coverage information to the directly interested parties,
insurers, and investigating law enforcement officers; and
(b) Disclose to the directly interested parties, insurers, and investigating law
enforcement officers whether the delivery network company driver was operating
during the delivery service period at the time of the accident.
(3) The insurance coverage information required in section 303.024 shall be
displayed or provided in either paper or electronic format.
9. (1) In a claims coverage investigation, a delivery network company or an
insurer of the delivery network company shall:
(a) Cooperate with all insurers that are involved in the claims coverage
investigation to facilitate the exchange of information; and
(b) Upon request by directly involved parties or an insurer of directly involved
parties, provide the times that a delivery network company driver began the delivery
service period on the delivery network company's digital network in:
a. The twelve-hour period immediately preceding the accident; and
b. The twelve-hour period immediately following the accident.
(2) An insurer potentially providing the coverage required in this section shall
disclose upon request by any other insurer involved in the particular claim a clear
description of the applicable coverage, exclusions, and limits provided under any motor
vehicle liability insurance policies maintained in order to satisfy the requirements of this
section.
10. An insurer of a delivery network company providing coverage under
subsections 2 and 3 of this section shall assume primary liability for a claim when:
(1) A dispute exists as to when the delivery service period began or ended; and
(2) The delivery network company does not have available, did not retain, or
fails to provide the information required in subsection 8 of this section.
11. A delivery network company shall not be deemed to control, direct, or
manage a personal vehicle or delivery network company driver who connects to the
delivery network company's digital network except if agreed to by written contract.
379.2020. 1. A delivery network company shall not permit a delivery network
company driver to engage in delivery services on the delivery network company's digital

HCS HB 1789 5
network until the delivery network company discloses in writing or electronically to the
delivery network company driver:
(1) The insurance coverage including, but not limited to, the types of coverage
and the limits for each coverage that the delivery network company provides while the
delivery network company driver uses a personal vehicle in connection with the delivery
network company's digital network; and
(2) That the delivery network company driver's own motor vehicle liability
insurance policy may not provide any insurance coverage during the delivery service
period.
2. A delivery network company shall verify that the driver has motor vehicle
liability insurance coverage in this state before the driver provides delivery network
services. The verification shall continue at every six-month interval thereafter, and until
such time as the driver continues to provide the delivery network services for the
delivery network company.
379.2025. 1. An insurer that is licensed to write motor vehicle liability insurance
in this state may exclude coverage and deny the duty to defend or indemnify for a claim
of injury or loss that occurs during the delivery service period.
2. The right to exclude all coverage under subsection 1 of this section may apply
to any coverage included in the motor vehicle liability insurance policy including, but
not limited to:
(1) Liability coverage for bodily injury and property damage;
(2) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage;
(3) Medical payments coverage;
(4) Comprehensive physical damage coverage; and
(5) Collision physical damage coverage.
3. Sections 379.2000 to 379.2025 shall not:
(1) Invalidate or limit an exclusion contained in a motor vehicle liability
insurance policy, including any insurance policy in use or approved for use that excludes
coverage for motor vehicles used for delivery or for any business use; or
(2) Invalidate, limit, or restrict an insurer's ability under existing law to:
(a) Underwrite any insurance policy; or
(b) Cancel and nonrenew an insurance policy.
4. A motor vehicle liability insurer that defends or indemnifies a claim against a
delivery network company driver that is excluded under the terms of its insurance
policy may seek recovery against the insurer providing insurance coverage under
subsections 2 and 3 of section 379.2015 if the claim:
(1) Occurs during the delivery service period; and

HCS HB 1789 6
(2) Is excluded under the terms of its insurance policy.
Section B. The enactment of sections 379.2000, 379.2005, 379.2010, 379.2015,
379.2020, and 379.2025 of section A of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2027.
✔